Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 327.829 is amended to read:
327.829. (1)  As part of the Early Literacy Success Initiative, the Department of Education shall
establish and administer the Early Literacy Success School Grant program.
(2) Under the program, the department shall award annual grants to school districts and  to
public charter schools that are elementary schools. The  grants must be used to implement the pur-
poses of the Early Literacy Success Initiative,  as identified in ORS 327.827, by funding the following:
(a) The provision of professional development and  coaching in research-aligned literacy strate-
gies [ to teachers  and administrators in early elementary grades ] to improve early literacy instruction.
Professional development and coaching:
(A) Must be provided to teachers and administrators in early elementary grades; and
(B) May be provided  to instructional assistants in early elementary grades and to any
other staff identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(b) The provision of extended  learning programs that use research-aligned literacy strategies
and that are made available to students in early elementary grades by licensed teachers  or by
qualified tutors. The extended learning programs may include:
(A) Home-based summer reading activities for students who need additional support  and
enrichment; and
(B) An intensive summer  school program for students who need the most additional support and
who receive at least 60 hours of  direct literacy instruction by an instructional assistant or a li-
censed teacher trained in research-aligned literacy strategies.
(c) The provision of high-dosage tutoring to students in early elementary grades  that integrates
reading and writing and that is  delivered by a qualified tutor using developmentally appropriate
practices.
[(d) The adoption  of curricula that uses research-aligned literacy strategies and the implementation
of that curricula. Funding under this paragraph may be used to: ]
(d) The adoption and  implementation of curricula that uses research-aligned literacy
strategies and that  is applicable starting in any grade from prekindergarten through grade
five. Funding under this paragraph may be used to:
(A) Purchase curricula and materials that are culturally relevant; or
Enrolled House Bill 3040 (HB 3040-C) Page 1
(B) Provide professional development  and time for teachers , [ and] administrators and instruc-
tional assistants in early elementary grades, and any other staff identified by the State
Board of Education by rule, to attend training related to the curricula.
(e) The employment of literacy specialists, coaches or interventionists.
(3) A grant received under ORS 327.833 may be used only  for purposes identified in subsection
(2) of this section for the benefit of children and students in prekindergarten through grade three.
(4) The State Board of Education  may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of grants
under ORS 327.829 to 327.837.  Rules shall, to the greatest extent practicable, prioritize schools with
the lowest rates of proficiency  in literacy and assist in the operational alignment of grant programs
and improvement strategies administered by the Department of Education, including:
(a) Grants distributed from the Student Investment Account,  as provided by ORS 327.175 to
327.235;
(b) Apportionments made under the High School  Graduation and College and Career Readiness
Act, as provided by ORS 327.853 to 327.895;  and
(c) District continuous improvement plans, as described in ORS 329.095.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.831 is amended to read:
327.831. (1) Any school district or public charter school that  is an elementary school may apply
for a noncompetitive grant under the Early Literacy Success School Grant  program as provided by
ORS 327.829 to 327.837.
(2) Grants awarded under ORS 327.833 are not competitive, but  a school district or public
charter school must comply with the requirements prescribed by ORS 327.829 to 327.837 and by rules
adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS 327.829 to 327.837.
(3) To be eligible for a grant  under ORS 327.833, a school district or public charter school must
submit to the Department of Education an application that includes:
(a) An early literacy success plan. The plan  must be updated every two years and must establish
four-year goals for the school district  or public charter school to achieve for making progress in
satisfying the purposes of the Early Literacy Success Initiative, as described in ORS 327.827. The
plan must include:
(A) A review of the  early literacy program, including the English language arts curricula used
by elementary schools of the school district or  by the public charter school, using criteria estab-
lished by the department;
(B) A student growth assessment for all students and disaggregated by student groups that  have
historically experienced academic disparities; and
(C) A description of how the school district or the public charter school will provide:
(i) Professional development and coaching, as described in ORS 327.829 (2)(a);
(ii) Extended learning programs, as described in ORS 327.829 (2)(b); and
(iii) High-dosage tutoring, as described in ORS 327.829 (2)(c).
(b) An accurate, up-to-date inventory of literacy  assessments, tools, curricula and digital re-
sources used by  the school district or public charter school to support literacy in early elementary
grades. The school district or public charter school must:
(A) Ensure that the literacy assessments, tools, curricula and digital resources of  the inventory
are based on research-aligned literacy strategies  and are formative, diagnostic and culturally re-
sponsive; and
(B) Include in the inventory the date of adoption of the  literacy assessment, tool, curriculum or
digital resource.
[(c) A plan for communication efforts to support engagement between: ]
[(A) School districts; ]
(c) Strategies for communicating and engaging with the following regarding the plan:
[(B)] (A) Elementary schools of the school district;
[(C)] (B) Families of the school district; and
[(D)] (C) Members of the school district community.
Enrolled House Bill 3040 (HB 3040-C) Page 2
(4) An application described in subsection (3) of  this section must be presented and approved
by the school district board or the governing body of the public charter school  at an open meeting
following:
(a) Oral presentation of the application by an administrator of  the school district or public
charter school to the school district board or the governing body of the public charter school; and
(b) Opportunity for the public to comment on the application.
(5) To the greatest extent practicable, a school district or public charter school shall  align an
early literacy success plan developed under this  section with the plan developed for distributions
from the Student Investment Account as provided by ORS 327.185 (7).
(6) For the purposes of this section, the department shall:
(a) Establish timelines and forms for applications submitted under this section;
(b) Evaluate applications before awarding grant funds;
(c) Assist school districts and public charter schools in prioritizing early  literacy investments
with funds received under this section; and
(d) Provide technical assistance to school districts  and public charter schools in developing and
implementing the early literacy success plan required for the application.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 327.835 is amended to read:
327.835. (1) Each recipient of an Early Literacy Success School  Grant under ORS 327.833 must
submit an annual report to the Department of Education.
(2) The report required under this section must include:
(a) The school district’s or public charter school’s progress  toward achieving the goals estab-
lished in the early literacy success plan, as described in ORS 327.831 (3);
(b) An inventory of literacy assessments, tools,  curricula and digital resources used by the
school district or the public charter school to support literacy;
(c) Evidence  that the literacy assessments, tools, curricula and digital resources in the inventory
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection are used  with fidelity to research-aligned literacy
strategies;
(d) Evidence that teachers , [ and] administrators , instructional assistants and other staff
identified by the State Board of  Education by rule  are provided with professional development
[plans] for using  and implementing, with fidelity to research-aligned literacy strategies, the literacy
assessments, tools, curricula and digital  resources in the inventory described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection;
(e) The number and percentage of administrators, teachers  and instructional assistants for
early elementary grades and the number and percentage of  other staff identified by the State
Board of Education who are  receiving professional development and coaching  as described in ORS
327.829 (2)(a), disaggregated by grade level;
(f) The number and percentage of students participating in early literacy extended  learning
programs, as described in ORS 327.829 (2)(b), at the school and the school district level  and their
outcomes disaggregated by student group and by grade level;
(g) The number and percentage of students participating in high-dosage tutoring,  as described
in ORS 327.829 (2)(c), at the  school and the school district level  and their outcomes disaggregated
by student group and by grade level; and
(h) The curricula being used by the school district or public charter school.
(3) Prior to [ December 31 ] February 1 of each year, the department shall:
(a) Submit to the committees or  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
education a summary of the Early Literacy  Success School Grant program, which must take into
consideration the reports submitted under subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Publish an online, easily accessible inventory of literacy assessments, tools,  curricula and
digital resources being used to support early literacy in early elementary grades.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 327.837 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3040 (HB 3040-C) Page 3
327.837. (1) Based on the reports submitted under ORS 327.835, the Department of  Education
shall monitor a school district’s or a public charter school’s progress  toward achieving the goals
established in the early literacy success plan, as described in ORS 327.831 (3).
(2) The department shall intervene when  a school district or public charter school does not meet
the goals established in the early literacy success plan.
(3) When the department intervenes, as  provided by subsection (2) of this section, the depart-
ment:
(a) Shall assist the  school district or the public charter school in developing a corrective action
plan; [ and]
(b) May retain any or all of the amount the school district or  public charter school would have
received as a distribution under ORS 327.833 and may use a portion of the amount  retained to pre-
pare and assist the school  district or the public charter school in implementing the corrective action
plan[.];
(c) May require the school district or the public charter  school to adopt textbooks or
other instructional materials from the list of textbooks and other  instructional materials
adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS 337.050 for early literacy; and
(d) May require the school district or the public charter school  to participate in school
or school district training and improvement activities, as identified by the department.
(4) An intervention and corrective action plan shall continue until  the school district or public
charter school makes sufficient and sustained progress  toward achieving the goals established in the
early literacy success plan. The department shall  determine when sufficient and sustained progress
has been achieved.
(5) If a school district or public charter school continues to fail to make progress toward
achieving the goals established in the early literacy success plan,  the department may take addi-
tional action, including not allowing for the distribution to the school district or public  charter
school of any additional moneys under ORS 327.833.
SECTION 4a. If Senate Bill 141 becomes law, section 4 of this 2025 Act  (amending ORS
327.837) is repealed.
SECTION 5.  ORS 327.843 is amended to read:
327.843. (1) As part of the Early Literacy Success Initiative, the Department of Education  shall
establish and administer the Early Literacy Success Community Grant program.
(2) The purposes of the grant program are to:
(a) Expand culturally and linguistically responsive early literacy programs for children in  early
elementary grades by:
(A) Encouraging family and caregiver engagement; and
(B) Providing research-aligned  professional training and coaching for direct service staff in early
literacy.
(b) Develop and implement programs that engage parents and children in early  elementary
grades in early literacy and that are available equitably and statewide.
(c) Provide high-dosage tutoring programs and training to tutors to qualify  the tutors for in-
struction in a manner consistent with research-aligned literacy strategies.
(d) Expand and develop language revitalization efforts by federally  recognized Indian tribes in
this state.
(3) Under the  program, the department shall distribute grants from the Early Literacy Success
Community Grant Fund  in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education. Rules
adopted under this section must:
(a) Establish metrics of success;
[(b) Be adopted in consultation with the federally recognized Indian tribes of this state; and ]
[(c)] (b) Align, to the greatest extent practicable, with:
(A) The purposes of  the Early Literacy Success School Grant program established by ORS
327.829 to 327.837;
(B) District continuous improvement plans, as described in ORS 329.095; and
Enrolled House Bill 3040 (HB 3040-C) Page 4
(C) Programs related to culturally specific parent and child support[ .]; and
(c) For grants awarded  for the purpose identified in subsection (2)(d) of this section, be
adopted in consultation with the federally recognized tribes of this state.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
Repassed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3040 (HB 3040-C) Page 5